Hawaii statutes.
§572-4 Right of domicile, sex or marital
status. The right of an individual to be or to become a resident domiciled
in this State shall not be denied or abridged because of the sex or marital
status of the individual. The residence of one spouse does not establish the
residence of the other spouse, which shall be determined by the same factors
that apply in determining the residence of any other individual capable of
having an independent residence. [L 1931, c 51, §1; RL 1935, §4633; RL 1945,
§12354; RL 1955, §323-4; HRS §572-4; am L 1981, c 6, §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next